Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Creditable Service During Temporary Disability

47-1-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Public employee” means an active member of a retirement system defined in paragraph (2) of this Code section.

“Retirement system” means:

The Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia provided for in Chapter 2 of this title;

The Teachers Retirement System of Georgia provided for in Chapter 3 of this title; and

The Public School Employees Retirement System provided for in Chapter 4 of this title.

“Temporary disability” means a physical or mental illness, sickness, or disorder caused by job-related disease or accident which causes a public employee to cease receiving compensation as an active public employee to the extent that the employee loses all or a portion of the period of temporary disability as creditable service under the employee’s respective retirement system, but the term does not include any period of disability during which the employee qualifies for a disability benefit under the respective retirement system or any period of disability for which the employee may receive creditable service under the provisions of the employee’s respective retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 868, § 1.

47-1-41.
Employees authorized to receive creditable service for period of temporary disability; application for creditable service; payment of employee contributions during period.

A public employee may receive creditable service under the public employee’s respective retirement system for a maximum of 12 months of temporary disability.
A public employee wishing to obtain such creditable service shall apply to the board of trustees or other official or body administering the respective retirement system within not more than six months after returning to service immediately following the temporary disability.
The public employee shall be required to pay the employee contributions that would have been paid during the period of temporary disability which is claimed for creditable service plus regular interest, as determined by the respective board of trustees or other official or body administering the respective retirement system, compounded from the period of disability for which creditable service is claimed to the date of payment.
Such employee contribution shall be based on the compensation the public employee was receiving for employee contribution purposes immediately prior to becoming temporarily disabled.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 868, § 1.

47-1-42.
Use of other provisions of article not precluded.

Obtaining creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this article shall not preclude the use of the provisions of this article to obtain creditable service for another future temporary disability, provided that there is a period of at least five years of active service as a contributing member of the respective retirement system between any claims for creditable service under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 868, § 1.

47-1-43.
Applicability of article; proof of temporary disability.

The provisions of this article shall apply to periods of temporary disability which occurred prior to July 1, 1994, as well as those which occur on or after that date.
The boards of trustees or other officials or bodies administering retirement systems may by rule or regulation require such proof of temporary disability and other documentation as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 868, § 1.